nl.aff
FLAG long
PFX Pp Y 1
PFX Pp 0 door .
PFX Pq Y 1
PFX Pq 0 dicht .
PFX Pr Y 1
PFX Pr 0 mee .
PFX Ps Y 1
PFX Ps 0 uit .
PFX Pt Y 1
PFX Pt 0 na .

# 3rd person, add a t to the stem
SFX V3 Y 3
SFX V3 0 t [^ao]		ts:VB3
SFX V3 0 at a		ts:VB3
SFX V3 0 ot o		ts:VB3

# past tense, add de or den to the stem
SFX Vp Y 2
SFX Vp 0 de .		ts:VBh1
SFX Vp 0 den .		ts:VBh

# past tense, add te or ten to the stem
SFX Vq Y 2
SFX Vq 0 te .		ts:VBh1
SFX Vq 0 ten .		ts:VBh

# rammelt => rammelde, rammelden
SFX Va Y 2
SFX Va t de t		ts:VBh1
SFX Va t den t		ts:VBh

# bakt => bakte, bakten
SFX Vb Y 2
SFX Vb t te t		ts:VBh1
SFX Vb t ten t		ts:VBh

# verb +d, +de
SFX Vi Y 2
SFX Vi 0 d .		ts:PPn
SFX Vi 0 de .		ts:PPe

# aangetekend => aangetekende
SFX Ve Y 1
SFX Ve 0 e .		ts:VBpe

# FLAGS FOR ADJECTIVES
# viezig => viezige, moe => moeë
SFX Aa Y 2
SFX Aa 0 e [^e]		ts:AJe
SFX Aa 0 ë e		ts:AJe

# lelijk => lelijker, raar => raarder
SFX Ab Y 2
SFX Ab 0 er [^r]	ts:AJcn
SFX Ab 0 der r		ts:AJcn

# lelijk => lelijkere, dor => dordere
SFX Ac Y 2
SFX Ac 0 ere [^r]	ts:AJce
SFX Ac 0 dere r		ts:AJce

# lelijk => lelijkst
SFX Ad Y 2
SFX Ad 0 st/A0 [^s]	ts:AJsn
SFX Ad 0 t/A0 s		ts:AJsn

# lelijkst => allerlelijkst
PFX A0 Y 1
PFX A0 0 aller

# lelijk => lelijkste
SFX Ae Y 2
SFX Ae 0 ste/A0 [^s]	ts:AJse
SFX Ae 0 te/A0 s		ts:AJse

# lelijk => lelijks
SFX Ai Y 1
SFX Ai 0 s .		ts:i

# baar => bare, boos=> boze (aaf,oof,oos)
SFX Al Y 38
SFX Al ob be oob	ts:AJe
SFX Al ad de aad	ts:AJe
SFX Al ed de eed	ts:AJe
SFX Al od de ood	ts:AJe
SFX Al af ve aaf	ts:AJe
SFX Al of ve oof	ts:AJe
SFX Al ag ge aag	ts:AJe
SFX Al eg ge eeg	ts:AJe
SFX Al og ge oog	ts:AJe
SFX Al ak ke aak	ts:AJe
SFX Al ek ke eek	ts:AJe
SFX Al ok ke ook	ts:AJe
SFX Al al le aal	ts:AJe
SFX Al el le eel	ts:AJe
SFX Al ol le ool	ts:AJe
SFX Al am me aam	ts:AJe
SFX Al om me oom	ts:AJe
SFX Al um me uum	ts:AJe
SFX Al an ne aan	ts:AJe
SFX Al en ne een	ts:AJe
SFX Al on ne oon	ts:AJe
SFX Al ar re aar	ts:AJe
SFX Al or re oor	ts:AJe
SFX Al es se ees	ts:AJe
SFX Al at te aat	ts:AJe
SFX Al et te eet	ts:AJe
SFX Al ot te oot	ts:AJe
SFX Al os ze oos	ts:AJe
SFX Al us se uus	ts:AJe
SFX Al ut te uut	ts:AJe
SFX Al ur re uur	ts:AJe
SFX Al er re eer	ts:AJe
SFX Al op pe oop	ts:AJe
SFX Al un ne uun	ts:AJe
SFX Al em me eem	ts:AJe
SFX Al ul le uul	ts:AJe
SFX Al as se aas	ts:AJe
SFX Al uk ke uuk	ts:AJe

# industrieel => industriële
SFX Am Y 1
SFX Am eel ële ieel	ts:AJe

# zwak => zwakke
SFX An Y 11
SFX An 0 de d	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 fe f	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 ge g	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 ke k	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 le l	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 me m	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 ne n	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 pe p	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 re r	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 se s	ts:AJe
SFX An 0 te t	ts:AJe

# zwak => zwakker
SFX Ao Y 11
SFX Ao 0 der d		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 fer f		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 ger g		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 ker k		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 ler l		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 mer m		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 ner n		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 per p		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 rer r		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 ser s		ts:AJc
SFX Ao 0 ter t		ts:AJc

# zwak => zwakkere
SFX Ap Y 11
SFX Ap 0 dere d		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 fere f		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 gere g		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 kere k		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 lere l		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 mere m		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 nere n		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 pere p		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 rere r		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 sere s		ts:AJce
SFX Ap 0 tere t		ts:AJce

# kwaad => kwader, boos=> bozer
SFX Aq Y 28
SFX Aq ob ber oob	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq ad der aad	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq ed der eed	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq od der ood	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq af ver aaf	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq of ver oof	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq ag ger aag	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq eg ger eeg	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq og ger oog	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq ak ker aak	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq ek ker eek	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq ok ker ook	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq al ler aal	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq el ler eel	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq ol ler ool	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq am mer aam	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq om mer oom	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq um mer uum	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq an ner aan	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq en ner een	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq on ner oon	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq es ser ees	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq at ter aat	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq et ter eet	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq ot ter oot	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq os zer oos	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq us ser uus	ts:AJcn
SFX Aq ut ter uut	ts:AJcn

# lief => lieve, precicieus => precisieuze
SFX Ar Y 2
SFX Ar f ve f	ts:AJce
SFX Ar s ze s	ts:AJce

# lief => liever
SFX As Y 2
SFX As f ver f	ts:AJcn
SFX As s zer s	ts:AJcn

# lief => lievere
SFX Ay Y 2
SFX Ay f vere f	ts:AJcn
SFX Ay s zere s	ts:AJcn

# kwaad => kwaders, boos=> bozers
SFX At Y 27
SFX At ob bers oob	ts:AJci
SFX At ad ders aad	ts:AJci
SFX At ed ders eed	ts:AJci
SFX At od ders ood	ts:AJci
SFX At af vers aaf	ts:AJci
SFX At of vers oof	ts:AJci
SFX At ag gers aag	ts:AJci
SFX At eg gers eeg	ts:AJci
SFX At og gers oog	ts:AJci
SFX At ak kers aak	ts:AJci
SFX At ek kers eek	ts:AJci
SFX At ok kers ook	ts:AJci
SFX At al lers aal	ts:AJci
SFX At el lers eel	ts:AJci
SFX At ol lers ool	ts:AJci
SFX At am mers aam	ts:AJci
SFX At om mers oom	ts:AJci
SFX At um mers uum	ts:AJci
SFX At an ners aan	ts:AJci
SFX At en ners een	ts:AJci
SFX At on ners oon	ts:AJci
SFX At es sers ees	ts:AJci
SFX At at ters aat	ts:AJci
SFX At et ters eet	ts:AJci
SFX At ot ters oot	ts:AJci
SFX At os zers oos	ts:AJci
SFX At us sers uus	ts:AJci

# lief => lievers
SFX Au Y 2
SFX Au f vers f	ts:AJci
SFX Au s zers s	ts:AJci

# zwak => zwakkers
SFX Av Y 11
SFX Av 0 ders d	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 fers f	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 gers g	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 kers k	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 lers l	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 mers m	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 ners n	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 pers p	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 rers r	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 sers s	ts:AJci
SFX Av 0 ters t	ts:AJci

# lelijk => lelijkers, raar => raarders
SFX Aw Y 2
SFX Aw 0 ers [^r]	ts:AJci
SFX Aw 0 ders r	ts:AJci

# kwaad => kwadere, boos=> bozere
SFX Ax Y 29
SFX Ax ob bere oob	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ad dere aad	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ed dere eed	ts:AJce
SFX Ax od dere ood	ts:AJce
SFX Ax af vere aaf	ts:AJce
SFX Ax f vere ief	ts:AJce
SFX Ax of vere oof	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ag gere aag	ts:AJce
SFX Ax eg gere eeg	ts:AJce
SFX Ax og gere oog	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ak kere aak	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ek kere eek	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ok kere ook	ts:AJce
SFX Ax al lere aal	ts:AJce
SFX Ax el lere eel	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ol lere ool	ts:AJce
SFX Ax am mere aam	ts:AJce
SFX Ax om mere oom	ts:AJce
SFX Ax um mere uum	ts:AJce
SFX Ax an nere aan	ts:AJce
SFX Ax en nere een	ts:AJce
SFX Ax on nere oon	ts:AJce
SFX Ax es sere ees	ts:AJce
SFX Ax at tere aat	ts:AJce
SFX Ax et tere eet	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ot tere oot	ts:AJce
SFX Ax os zere oos	ts:AJce
SFX Ax us sere uus	ts:AJce
SFX Ax ut tere uut	ts:AJce

# GEOGRAFIE

SFX Gb Y 1
SFX Gb 0 brug .	ts:DT

SFX Gd Y 1
SFX Gd 0 dijk .	ts:DT

SFX Gs Y 1
SFX Gs 0 straat .	ts:DT

SFX Gl Y 1
SFX Gl 0 laan .	ts:DT

SFX Gh Y 1
SFX Gh 0 hof .	ts:DT

SFX Gi Y 1
SFX Gi 0 singel .	ts:DT

SFX Gp Y 1
SFX Gp 0 plein .	ts:DT

SFX Gk Y 1
SFX Gk 0 kanaal .	ts:DT

SFX Ga Y 1
SFX Ga 0 kade .	ts:DT

SFX Gw Y 1
SFX Gw 0 weg .	ts:DT

SFX GL Y 1
SFX GL straat laan straat	ts:DT

SFX GW Y 1
SFX GW straat weg straat	ts:DT
