nl.dic
aanstort/Vb
actief/AdAeAiArAsAx
actueel/AiAlAqAdAeAqAx
acuut/AdAiAlAqAx
adaptief/ArAs
adequaat/AdAlAqAx
afpeelt/Va
afschetst/Vb
agressief/AdArAeAiAsAy
algemeen/AdAiAlAqAeAx
alternatief/ArAiAsAx
Annerveensche/Gk
artificieel/AdAm
assertief/ArAsAc
assureert/Va
attributief/Ar
autonoom/AlAqZf
bebouwbaar/Al
Beets/GsGl
begrĳpelĳk/AaAbAcAdAeAi
Beinumstraat/GL
belangrĳk/AaAbAcAdAeAiZmAw
bemachtig/V3Vp
bepalend/AaAbAcAe
Berger/PNGw
beschĳnen/Vi
besproeid/Ve
bewolk/V3Vq
bibberig/AaAb
bidden/PbPjViPnPr
biets/V3Vq
Bĳbels/AaAb
bĳmest/Vb
bizar/AdAeAiAbAn
blauw/AaAbAcAdAeAiZm
Bleker/PNGs
bloedig/AaAbAcAdAe
bloeien/ViPpPsPt
Boerhaave/GsGlGpGw
bomen/ViPs
brak/AbAdAnAo
braken/PbPjPpPs
Bredestraat/GWGL
brodt/Va
brokkel/PjV3Vp
buitengemeen/Al
Bunt/PNGlGw
Burcht/PNPIGlGw
cheat/ZaVb
choreograferen/Vi
clean/AaAbAiAcAw
Colenbrander/Gs
collegiaal/AlAq
commutatief/Ar
concurrentieel/Am
cool/AaAbAeAiAcAdAe
coöperatief/ArAs
Damstraat/GWGL
declineert/Va
deren/ViPt
determinatief/Ar
diaconaal/Al
Diana/PNGsGl
dichtbezet/An
diepgaand/AaAbAc
dingen/PjViPr
discreet/AdAlAq
dobbel/V3Vp
doen/PbPePjViPlPmPnPpPqPrPsPt
doseer/V3Vp
dos/V3VqPs
dras/AnAo
dring/PbV3PnPoPp
droogkomiek/AaZb
droogmaalt/Va
dros/V3Vq
druk/AdAeAnAoAp
drummen/Vi
economisch-financieel/Am
edelmoedig/AaAbAe
eerwaardig/AaAbZm
efficiënt/AaAbAcAdAeAaAbAcAdAe
eigenlĳk/AaAi
Elzas/Gs
ernstig/AaAbAcAdAeAiAw
extravagant/AaAbAcAdAeAi
fantasievol/AnAo
Fazantstraat/GWGL
feilbaar/Al
financieel/AmAi
Flevostraat/GWGL
Flier/PNGw
fluit/PbPjPsPt
Franck/PNGsGl
frees/V3VpPs
fris/AnAoAp
frivool/AdAlAqAi
gasnet/AdAeAnAoAp
gebeerd/Ve
gedaan/PbPjPmPnPpPqPrPsPt
gedacht/PpPrPsPt
gedeeld/PjVePrPs
gedemagnetiseerd/Ve
geestig/AaAbAcAdAeAi
gefraudeerd/Ve
gegild/Ps
gekieperd/VePs
geknoopt/PaPbPjVePq
gekweekt/PbVePp
gemoedereerd/Aa
gemolesteerd/Ve
gênant/AaAbAcAdAeAiAaAbAcAdAe
genotvol/AnAo
geprofiteerd/VePr
gerekend/PbPjVePnPpPrPsPt
gerenommeerd/AaAbAcAe
gericht/PbPjVePsAi
gesimuleerd/Ve
geslibd/PbVePq
gestoten/PbPjPpPs
gestreng/AaAbAcAe
gestroomlĳnd/VeAbAcAdAe
gewaaierd/VePs
gewerkt/PjVePlPnPpPrPsPt
gezeuld/PbVePr
glorieus/Ar
gooien/PbPjViPmPqPs
graaien/Vi
Groot/PNGsGl
hartelĳk/AaAbAcAdAeAi
hautain/AaAbAc
heenstroomt/Va
hefvlak/AdAnAoAp
Hekstraat/GW
Helfrich/PNGsGlGw
herĳk/V3Vq
herplant/CaCbVq
Hoefbladstraat/GL
Hogenkamp/PNGw
hot/AdAeAiAn
ideeëloos/Aq
ĳsbeer/VpV3
ĳverig/AaAbAcAdAeZm
ĳzingwekkend/AaAbAe
imbeciel/AaAbAeZb
ingegaan/Al
ingehakt/Ve
ingewikkeld/AaAbAcAdAeAiAw
interactief/ArAsAi
international/AaAbAiAc
inwacht/VqVb
jagen/PbPjViPmPpPt
Jan/PNGsGl
judicieel/Am
Juliana/PNSvCAGl
kalk/CcCaVq
Kasteelstraat/GWGL
keur/PjV3Vp
kiek/V3Vq
Kievits/PNGlGw
klampen/PbVi
klikken/PbViPpPq
kloek/AaAbAcAdAeZm
knagen/PjViPpPs
knap/AdAeAnAoApAi
Kortenaerstraat/GL
kwalitatief/Ar
kwamen/PbPjPlPmPnPoPpPrPsPt
laf/AdAeAnAo
leden/PmPr
leep/AdAqAdAe
lek/AdAnAoAp
lekkerbek/V3Vq
Lepelaar/PNGsGw
levenskrachtig/AaAb
lĳmig/Aa
Lĳsterbesstraat/GWGL
link/AaAbAcAdAeAi
loos/AlAqZm
maak/PbPjV3VqPlPmPpPqPrPsPtCcXc
maken/PbPjViPlPmPpPqPrPsPt
mal/AbAdAeAiAnAo
Marjolein/PNGsGlGw
meelokt/Vb
Mees/PNGl
melodieus/ArAdAsAx
metershoog/Al
misluk/V3Vq
mooi/AaAbAcAdAeAiAw
muilbandt/Va
Mussel/Gk
nadelig/AaAbAcAdAeAi
Naeffstraat/GL
net/AdAeAnAoApAi
niet-commercieel/Am
niet-religieus/Ar
Nieuwestraat/GWGL
nĳdig/AaAbAdAe
nodig/AaAbAdAw
normaal/AdAeAlAqAxAiZf
oerstom/An
omkaderd/AaAa
omploeg/V3Vp
omspelden/Vi
onafhankelĳk/AaAbAcAdAeAi
onbehouwen/AbAeZm
onbekwaam/AdAlAq
onderstreep/V3Vq
ongenietbaar/AlAb
onofficieel/Am
onzalig/AaAb
opgerekt/Ve
oplepel/V3Vp
oplĳst/Vb
opzienbarend/AaAbAdAeAi
Oranje/CeGlGw
origineel/AdAeAiAlAqZf
oudchristelĳk/Aa
overwerkt/AaZmVb
Paardebloem/Gs
pace/V3Vq
pastoraal/AlZf
perfect/AaAbAdAiAc
Pius/GpGh
ploegen/PbPjViPpPs
pointeren/Vi
Polstraat/GW
positief/AdAiArAdAe
potentieel/Am
potnat/AdAeAiAnAoAp
pratikeert/Va
prettig/AaAbAcAdAeAiAw
profiteren/ViPr
Raiffeisenstraat/GL
reclameer/V3Vp
reed/PbPgPhPjPmPnPoPpPrPsPt
referentieel/Am
reinig/V3Vp
Rembrandt/PNSvCAGhGiGlGaGpGs
representatief/ArAs
retroactief/Ar
rĳp/AaAbAcAdAe
rik/V3Vq
rondborstig/AaAbAe
royaal/AdAlAqAx
ruimvallend/Aa
Scheperstraat/GW
Schiphol/CAGw
schitterend/AaAbAcAdAeAi
schoof/PbPgPhPjPlPmPpPqPs
schrander/AaAdAiAb
Schubert/PNGsGl
simultaan/AlAi
sip/AdAnAoVq
sleet/PjPpPs
slim/AdAeAiAnAoAp
smaakvol/AdAnAoAdAe
smerig/AaAbAcAdAeAi
snuffen/Vi
speld/V3VpPn
Spiering/PNGsGw
spĳkeren/PbViPlPq
Sportparkstraat/GWGL
spreek/PbPjV3PnPpPrPs
stap/PjV3VqPmPoPpPs
straf/AdAeAnAoApAiZm
streef/V3VpPt
substantieel/AiAm
Suez/Gk
suf/AdAiAnAoAdAe
suggereer/V3Vp
supprimeert/Va
tanig/AaAbAe
temperamentvol/AnAo
testen/ViPs
textiel/Aa
theatraal/AdAlAqAi
tochtig/AaAbAe
toehap/V3Vq
toelonkt/Vb
toeristisch-recreatief/Ar
trotseer/V3Vp
urgent/AaAbAcAdAeAi
vaal/AdAlAqAxAiZm
veilig/AaAbAcAdAeAiAw
verbeelden/Vi
vergaan/ViAl
verkwist/Ve
verslaaf/V3Vp
verslibt/Va
verstrooi/V3Vp
verwĳs/V3Pp
viel/PbPgPjPlPmPnPoPqPrPs
vierkant/Vq
voltrok/PbPjPlPmPnPoPpPqPrPsPt
voorkomend/AbAdAe
voorlopig/AaAi
Voorster/Gw
voorzichtig/AaAbAcAdAe
vreedzaam/AdAlAqAdAe
vroegen/PbPjPmPpPrPsPt
vrouwonvriendelĳk/Aa
waardevol/AdAeAiAnAoAp
wachten/PjVi
Wagenaar/PNGsGl
wak/AaAbAdAnAoApZe
weglacht/Vb
Weyden/Gs
Wikkestraat/GL
wip/PbV3VqPmPoPs
wis/AnAo
Wisentstraat/GW
zĳpelen/ViPp
zing/V3PnPrPs
zinnig/AaAbAcAiAwAdAe
zorgelĳk/AaAbAcAdAeZm
zorgzaam/AdAlAq
